apertium-nhi.nhi.lexc
LEXICON Adj-Esp-mf
%<adj%>%<mf%>%<barb%>%<sg%>:0  # ;
%<adj%>%<mf%>%<sg%>:0  # ;
%<adj%>%<mf%>%<barb%>%<pl%>:%>%{e%}s  # ;
%<adj%>%<mf%>%<pl%>:%>%{e%}s  # ;


LEXICON Adj-Esp-m/f
%<adj%>%<barb%>%<m%>%<sg%>:o  # ;
%<adj%>%<barb%>%<f%>%<sg%>:a  # ;
%<adj%>%<barb%>%<m%>%<pl%>:os  # ;
%<adj%>%<barb%>%<f%>%<pl%>:as  # ;

%<adj%>%<m%>%<sg%>:o  # ;
%<adj%>%<f%>%<sg%>:a  # ;
%<adj%>%<m%>%<pl%>:os  # ;
%<adj%>%<f%>%<pl%>:as  # ;



LEXICON Preposiciones 

de:de                        Pr-Esp ;  ! "de"
de%<pr%>%+el%<det%>%<def%>:de%>l #;
de%<pr%>%+in%<det%>:de%>n #;

a:a                          Pr-Esp ;  ! "a"
por:por                      Pr-Esp ;  ! "por"
en:en                      Pr-Esp ;  ! "en"
desde:desde                      Pr-Esp ;  ! "desde"
para:para                    Pr-Esp ;  ! "para"
por:por                    Pr-Esp ;  ! "para"
sin:sin                      Pr-Esp ; ! "sin"
hasta:hasta                  Pr-Esp ; ! ""
como:como                        Pr-Esp ;  ! "por"
ic:ic                        Pr ;  ! "por"

LEXICON Conj
ihcuac%<cnjsub%>:ihcuac # ;
tla%<cnjsub%>:tla # ;
tlamo%<cnjsub%>:tlamo # ; ! "si no"
queman%<cnjsub%>:queman # ;
hasta%<cnjsub%>%<barb%>:hasta # ;
nic%<cnjsub%>:nic # ;

ozo%<cnjcoo%>:oz # ;
ozo%<cnjcoo%>:ozo # ;
nozo%<cnjcoo%>:nozo # ;

y%<cnjcoo%>%<barb%>:y # ;
pero%<cnjcoo%>%<barb%>:pero # ;
huan%<cnjcoo%>%<barb%>:huan # ;
o%<cnjcoo%>%<barb%>:o # ;
mas%<cnjcoo%>%<barb%>:mas # ;
masqui%<cnjcoo%>:masqui # ;

LEXICON Interjecciones 

ay:ay                        INTJ ; ! "ay"
aaa:aaa                      INTJ ; ! "aaa"
ah:ah                        INTJ ; ! "ah"
igual:igual                  INTJ ; ! "igual"
sí:sí                        INTJ ; ! "sí"
mm:mm                        INTJ ; ! "mmm"
eh:eh                        INTJ ; ! " eh"
este:este                    INTJ ; ! ""
nen:nen                      INTJ ; ! "este..."
nene:nene                    INTJ ; ! "este..."


LEXICON Puntuación

%!%<sent%>:%! # ;
%"%<sent%>:%" # ;
%(%<lpar%>:%( # ;
%)%<rpar%>:%) # ;
%-%<guio%>:%- # ;
%:%<sent%>:%: # ;
%:%<sent%>:%: # ;
%;%<sent%>:%; # ;
%;%<sent%>:%; # ;
%?%<sent%>:%? # ;
%?%<sent%>:%? # ;
%[%<lpar%>:%[ # ;
%]%<rpar%>:%] # ;
%¡%<sent%>:%¡ # ;
%«%<lquot%>:%« # ;
%»%<rquot%>:%» # ;
%¿%<lquest%>:%¿ # ;
%–%<guio%>:%– # ;
%—%<guio%>:%— # ;
%“%<lquot%>:%“ # ;
%”%<rquot%>:%” # ;
,%<cm%>:, # ;
.%<sent%>:. # ;
..%<sent%>:.. # ;
...%<sent%>:... # ;
/%<sent%>:/ # ;
\%<sent%>:\ # ;
…%<sent%>:…   # ;
…%<sent%>:… # ;
（%<lpar%>:（ # ;
）%<rpar%>:） # ;


! LEXICON Digits

! <[ %0 | 1 | 2 | 3 | 4 | 5 | 6 | 7 | 8 | 9 ]+> NUM ;
! <[ %0 | 1 | 2 | 3 | 4 | 5 | 6 | 7 | 8 | 9 ] [ %, | %. ] [ %0 | 1 | 2 | 3 | 4 | 5 | 6 | 7 | 8 | 9 ]+> NUM ;

LEXICON Adjetivos
atrasado:atrasad      Adj-Esp-m/f ; ! "atrasado"
lácteo:lácte          Adj-Esp-m/f ; ! "milky"
morado:morad          Adj-Esp-m/f ; ! ""
originario:originari   Adj-Esp-m/f ; ! "originating"
borracho:borrach       Adj-Esp-m/f ; ! 
reconocido:reconocid   Adj-Esp-m/f ; ! "reconocido"
cancerígeno:cancerígen Adj-Esp-m/f ; ! ""
pobre:pobre            Adj-Esp-mf ; ! "pobre"
difícil:difícil        Adj-Esp-mf ; ! "difícil"
unido:unid             Adj-Esp-m/f ; ! "unido"
chistoso:chistos       Adj-Esp-m/f ; ! "chistoso"
mexicano:mexican       Adj-Esp-m/f ; ! "mexicano"
nuclear:nuclear        Adj-Esp-mf  ; ! "nuclear
americano:american     Adj-Esp-m/f ; ! "americano"
frances:frances        Adj-Esp-mf ;  ! "francés"
español:español        Adj-Esp-mf ; ! "español"
patronal:patronal      Adj-Esp-mf ; ! "patronal"
austral:austral        Adj-Esp-mf ; ! ""
principal:principal    Adj-Esp-mf ; ! ""
electromagnética:electromagnétic Adj-Esp-m/f ;
espacial:espacial      Adj-Esp-mf ;
nanométrico:nanométric Adj-Esp-m/f ;
